Hawaii statutes.
[§353-133] Satisfaction of victims'
rights to notification. Participation in the system and making offender
data available on a timely basis to the system shall be deemed to satisfy the
obligations of:

(1) The department to notify the victim of changes in
the offender's custodial status pursuant to section 801D-4(a)(7); and

(2) The police and prosecuting attorney to notify the
victim of the offender's release from custody pursuant to section 801D-4(a)(1).
[L 2012, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next